Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.133.005

Finding—Intent.

The legislature finds that financially needy students, especially those with dependents, are finding it increasingly difficult to stay in school due to the high costs of caring for their dependent children.

The legislature intends to establish an educational assistance grant program, funded through gifts, grants, or endowments from private sources, for students with dependents who have additional financial needs due to the care they provide for their dependents eighteen years of age or younger.

[ 2003 c 19 s 1.]